Louisiana, session 2026, HB95.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Limitation of liability; failure to use applicable health insurance
coverage; automobile accidents
A. For the purposes of this Section, "health insurance coverage" means
benefits consisting of healthcare services provided through insurance,
reimbursement, or otherwise which includes items and services paid for as healthcare
services under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or
medical service plan contract, preferred provider organization agreement, or health
maintenance organization contract offered by a health issuer, the office of group
benefits, Medicare, Medicaid, or equivalent state health plans.
B. In any action for recovery of past medical expenses arising out of an
automobile accident, if the claimant has applicable health insurance coverage and the
claimant failed to utilize the health insurance coverage, the recovery of past medical
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-235 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 95
expenses shall not exceed the amount that would have been paid by the claimant's
health insurance coverage.
C. The provisions of this Section do not apply to claims made pursuant to the
Louisiana Workers' Compensation Law as provided in R.S. 23:1020.1 et seq.